Idaho statutes. Title 44 LABOR
Chapter 8
SECONDARY BOYCOTT ACT

Sec.

§ 44-801. Secondary boycott.

It shall be unlawful to cause or threaten to cause, and/or combine or conspire to cause or threaten to cause, injury to one not a party to the particular labor dispute, to aid which such boycott is initiated or continued, whether by (a) withholding patronage, labor, or other beneficial business intercourse; (b) picketing; (c) refusing to handle, install, use or work on particular materials, equipment or supplies; or (d) by any other means, in order to bring him against his will into a concerted plan to coerce or inflict damage upon another or to compel the party with whom such labor dispute exists to comply with any particular demands.

§ 44-802. Penalty.

Any person, firm, individual, corporation, labor organization or association of persons found guilty of committing, or causing to be committed, any of the acts herein declared to be unlawful, shall be deemed guilty of misdemeanor.

§ 44-803. Short title.

This act may be cited as “The Secondary Boycott Act.”